California statutes. Insurance Code
(ii) (I) When implemented by the board, subject to subdivision (b) of Section 12693.765 and pursuant to this section, a child under the age of two years who was delivered by a mother enrolled in the Access for Infants and Mothers Program as described in Part 6.3 (commencing with Section 12695). Commencing July 1, 2007, eligibility under this subparagraph shall not include infants during any time they are enrolled in employer-sponsored health insurance or are subject to an exclusion pursuant to Section 12693.71 or 12693.72, or are enrolled in the full scope of benefits under the Medi-Cal program at no share of cost. For
 purposes of this clause, any infant born to a woman whose enrollment in the Access for Infants and Mothers Program begins after June 30, 2004, shall be automatically enrolled in the Healthy Families Program, except during any time on or after July 1, 2007, that the infant is enrolled in employer-sponsored health insurance or is subject to an exclusion pursuant to Section 12693.71 or 12693.72, or is enrolled in the full scope of benefits under the Medi-Cal program at no share of cost. Except as otherwise specified in this section, this enrollment shall cover the first 12 months of the infant’s life. At the end of the 12 months, as a condition of continued eligibility, the applicant shall provide income information. The infant shall be disenrolled if the gross annual household income exceeds the income eligibility standard that was in effect in the Access for Infants and Mothers Program at the time the infant’s mother became eligible, or following the two-month period established in Section 12693.981 if the
 infant is eligible for Medi-Cal with no share of cost. At the end of the second year, infants shall again be screened for program eligibility pursuant to this section, with income eligibility evaluated pursuant to clause (i), subparagraphs (B) and (C), and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(II) Effective on October 1, 2013, or when the State Department of Health Care Services has implemented Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15810) of Part 3.3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, whichever is later, eligibility for coverage in the program pursuant to this clause shall terminate. The board shall coordinate with the State Department of Health Care Services to implement Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15810) of Part 3.3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, including transition of subscribers to the AIM-Linked Infants Program. The State Department of Health Care Services shall administer the AIM-Linked Infants
 Program, pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15810) of Part 3.3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to address the health care needs of children formerly covered pursuant to this clause.

(B) All income over 200 percent of the federal poverty level but less than or equal to 250 percent of the federal poverty level shall be disregarded in calculating annual or monthly household income.

(C) In a family with an annual or monthly household income greater than 250 percent of the federal poverty level, any income deduction that is applicable to a child under Medi-Cal shall be applied in determining the annual or monthly household income. If the income deductions reduce the annual or monthly household income to 250 percent or less of the federal poverty level, subparagraph (B) shall be applied.

(b) The applicant shall agree to remain in the program for six months, unless other coverage is obtained and proof of the coverage is provided to the program.

(c) An applicant shall enroll all of the applicant’s eligible children in the program.

(d) In filing documentation to meet program eligibility requirements, if the applicant’s income documentation cannot be provided, as defined in regulations promulgated by the board, the applicant’s signed statement as to the value or amount of income shall be deemed to constitute verification.

(e) An applicant shall pay in full any family contributions owed in arrears for any health, dental, or vision coverage provided by the program within the prior 12 months.

(f) By January 2008, the board, in
 consultation with stakeholders, shall implement processes by which applicants for subscribers may certify income at the time of annual eligibility review, including rules concerning which applicants shall be permitted to certify income and the circumstances in which supplemental information or documentation may be required. The board may terminate using these processes not sooner than 90 days after providing notification to the Chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. This notification shall articulate the specific reasons for the termination and shall include all relevant data elements that are applicable to document the reasons for the termination. Upon the request of the Chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the board shall promptly provide any additional clarifying information regarding implementation of the processes required by this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 35.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.71.

(a) The board shall monitor applications to determine whether employers and employees have dropped employer-sponsored dependent coverage in order to participate in the program.

(b) The board may disapprove an application if it is determined that the children to be covered under the application were covered by an employer-sponsored insurance within the last three months.

(c) If the board imposes the limitation identified in subdivision (b) or (d), it shall also establish exceptions to this limitation in cases where prior coverage ended due to reasons unrelated to the availability of the program. This shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Loss of employment due to factors other than voluntary termination.

(2) Change to a new employer that does not provide an option for dependent coverage.

(3) Change of address so that no employer sponsored coverage is available.

(4) Discontinuation of health benefits to all employees of the applicant’s employer.

(5) Expiration of COBRA coverage period.

(6) Coverage provided pursuant to an exemption authorized under subdivision (i) of Section 1367 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) If the board determines, based on evidence gathered during a reasonable period of program operation, that a substantial share of funds expended for the program are providing health coverage for children that have discontinued employer-based coverage in order to enter the program or if required by the federal government for state plan approval, the board may take actions to increase the three-month time limit specified in subdivision (b), to such a time limit that cannot exceed six months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.72.

(a) The board may disapprove an application if it is determined that the children to be covered under the application were covered by an individual health care service plan contract or individual disability insurance policy during a specified period of time prior to the date of application only if required by the federal government for state plan approval. This time limitation period shall not exceed the time period required by the federal government.

(b) If the board imposes the time limitation identified in subdivision (a), it shall also establish exceptions to this limitation in cases where the prior coverage ended due to reasons unrelated to the availability of the program. This shall include, but not be limited to, the prior coverage being pursuant to a health plan operating pursuant to an exemption authorized by subdivision (i) of Section 1367 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.73.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, children excluded from coverage under Title XXI of the Social Security Act are not eligible for coverage under the program, except as specified in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 12693.70 and Section 12693.76.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 230, Sec. 19.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.74.

(a) To the extent federal financial participation is available, and subject to subdivision (e), the child shall remain continuously eligible for the program up to five years of age. The department shall seek any federal approvals that may be necessary to implement this subdivision.

(b) (1) Implementation of this section is contingent on all of the following conditions:

(A) All necessary federal approvals have been obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (e).

(B) The Legislature has appropriated funding to implement this section after a determination that ongoing General Fund resources are available to
 support the ongoing implementation of this section in the 2024–25 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years.

(C) The department has determined that systems have been programmed to implement this section.

(2) The department shall issue a declaration certifying the date that all conditions in paragraph (1) have been met. The department shall post the declaration on its internet website and provide a copy of the declaration to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Legislative Counsel.

(c) If at any time the director determines that the eligibility criteria established under this section for the program may jeopardize the state’s ability to receive federal financial participation under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), any
 amendment or extension of that act, or any similar federal legislation affecting federal financial participation, the director may alter the eligibility criteria to the extent necessary for the state to receive that federal financial participation.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12693.25) and Part 6.1 (commencing with Section 12670), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, through all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(e) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained, and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(f) (1) If the voters approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, this section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), whichever is later.

(2) If the voters do not approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, this section shall be repealed as of January 1, 2025.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 36) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 25.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Section conditionally operative on January 1, 2025, or later, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.75.

(a) The program shall make use of a simple and easy to understand mail-in application process.

(b) For children referred pursuant to Section 14005.41 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the program shall utilize the school lunch application and any supplemental forms received pursuant to Section 14005.41 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to make an eligibility determination and shall request additional information only as needed to complete the eligibility process.

(c) The Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board may adopt emergency regulations to implement subdivision (b) and coordinate with all other state and local government entities in the implementation of Section 49557.2 of the Education Code and Section 14005.41 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Any rules and regulations issued by the board pertaining to the implementation of this section may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption and one readoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare, and shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. Any emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of Regulations, and shall remain in effect for not more than 180 days unless the department readopts those regulations. The regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 729, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.755.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), commencing four months after the initial federal approval is obtained pursuant to the waiver described in subdivision (b), the board shall expand eligibility under this part to uninsured parents of, and as defined by the board, adults responsible for, children enrolled to receive coverage under this part or who are enrolled to receive the full scope of Medi-Cal services with no share of cost and whose income does not exceed 250 percent of the federal poverty level, before applying the income disregard provided for in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 12693.70.

(b) (1) The board shall implement a program to provide coverage under this part to any uninsured parent or responsible adult who is eligible pursuant to subdivision (a), pursuant to the waiver identified in paragraph (2).

(2) The program shall be implemented only in accordance with a State Child Health Insurance Program waiver pursuant to Section 1397gg(e)(2)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code, to provide coverage to uninsured parents and responsible adults, and shall be subject to the terms, conditions, and duration of the waiver. The services shall be provided under the program only if the waiver is approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and, except as provided under the terms and conditions of the waiver, only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and funds are appropriated specifically for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 171, Sec. 15.   Effective August 10, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.76.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a child who meets the definition of the term defined in subsection (b) or (c) of Section 1641 of Title 8 of the United States Code shall not be determined ineligible solely on the basis of the child’s date of entry into the United States.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subdivision (a) may only be implemented to the extent provided in the annual Budget Act.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any uninsured parent or responsible adult who meets the definition of the term defined in subsection (b) or
 (c) of Section 1641 of Title 8 of the United States Code shall not be determined to be ineligible solely on the basis of that person’s date of entry into the United States.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subdivision (c) may only be implemented to the extent of funding provided in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 37.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.765.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and subject to subdivision (b), a child described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 12693.70 shall be deemed eligible to participate in the program at birth.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subdivision (a) and clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 12693.70 may only be implemented to the extent that funds are appropriated for that purpose in the annual Budget Act or other statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 230, Sec. 20.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Fiscal Integrity [12693.77. - 12693.77.]

12693.77.

(a) The board shall develop safeguards to assure the fiscal integrity of the program.

(b) The program shall ensure that subscribers are not eligible for no-cost full-scope Medi-Cal coverage. The board may provide data on applicants and subscribers to the State Department of Health Services for determination of Medi-Cal eligibility. The State Department of Health Services shall identify those subscribers enrolled in the program who are concurrently enrolled in Medi-Cal with no share of cost.

(c) Any person who intentionally makes false declarations as to his or her eligibility or any person who intentionally makes false declarations as to eligibility on behalf of any other person seeking eligibility under this part for which that person is not eligible shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) Plans and providers shall be subject to Section 550 of the Penal Code.

(e) Any person who intentionally makes false declarations as to his or her eligibility or any person who intentionally makes false declarations as to eligibility on behalf of any other person seeking eligibility under this part for which that person is not eligible may be denied coverage for up to one year from the date of the denial of coverage by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Protection Against Substitution of Benefits [12693.80. - 12693.84.]

12693.80.

The board shall use due diligence in the creation of participation standards for the program that minimize the incentive for employers or applicants to drop or reduce dependent health coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.81.

(a) It shall constitute unfair competition for purposes of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code for an insurer, an insurance agent or broker, or an administrator, as defined in Section 1759, to refer an individual employee or employee’s dependent to the program, or arrange for an individual employee or employee’s dependent to apply for the program, for the purpose of separating that employee or employee’s dependent from group health coverage in connection with the employee’s employment.

(b) Any employee applicant in subdivision (a) shall have personal right of action to enforce subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.82.

It shall constitute an unfair labor practice contrary to public policy, and enforceable under Section 95 of the Labor Code, for any employer to refer an individual employee or employee’s dependent to the program, or to arrange for an individual employee or employee’s dependent to apply to the program, for the purpose of separating that employee or employee’s dependent from group health coverage provided in connection with the employee’s employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.83.

(a) It shall constitute an unfair labor practice contrary to public policy and enforceable under Section 95 of the Labor Code for any employer to change the employee-employer share-of-cost ratio based upon the employee’s wage base or job classification or to make any modification of coverage for employees and employee’s dependents in order that the employees or employee’s dependents enroll in the program established pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.84.

For purposes of Sections 12693.82 and 12693.83, group health coverage includes any group disability insurance policy covering hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, group health care service plan contract, or self-insured employee welfare benefit plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Appeals [12693.85. - 12693.89.]

12693.85.

Program decisions described in this section may be appealed to the board. If an applicant believes that a written decision on one of the following specified issues was made in violation of the program statutes or regulations, or other written representation of program policy made to the individual by the program or the board, that individual may file an appeal with the board. Decisions that may be appealed are the following:

(a) A decision that a child is not qualified to participate or continue to participate in the program.

(b) A decision that a child is not eligible for enrollment or continuing enrollment in the program.

(c) A decision as to the effective date of coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.86.

(a) An appeal shall be filed in writing with the executive director within 60 calendar days of the date of the notice of the decision being appealed.

(b) An appeal shall include all of the following:

(1) A copy of any decision being appealed, or a written statement of the action or failure to act being appealed.

(2) A statement specifically describing the issues that are disputed by the appellant.

(3) A statement specifically describing the program statute or regulation, or other written representation of program policy that the appellant believes the program or board violated.

(4) A statement of the resolution requested by the appellant.

(5) Any other relevant information the appellant wants to include.

(c) Any appeal that does not specifically allege a violation of a program statute or regulation, or other written representation of program policy will be deemed to be a request for program review pursuant to Section 12693.88.

(d) An appeal that specifically alleges a violation of program statute or regulation or other written representation of program policy, but fails to include any other necessary information, shall be returned to the appellant without review. The appellant may resubmit the appeal. The resubmittal shall be filed within the time limits of subdivision (a) or within 20 calendar days of the receipt of the returned appeal, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.87.

(a) Any appellant who files an appeal pursuant to Section 12693.85 shall receive an initial administrative review of the appeal.

(b) Administrative reviews of appeals shall be conducted in two steps. Each appeal will be reviewed by the program to determine if the requested resolution is required by the statutes and regulations governing the program, or required in order to be consistent with a written representation of program policy made by the program or the board. If so, the appropriate action will be taken within 30 days of the receipt of the appeal, and the appellant will be notified. If not, the appellant will be so notified within 30 days of the receipt of the appeal and informed that he or she may request review by the executive director. This request must be filed in writing with the executive director within 30 days of the date of the notice of the program determination and shall include the information specified in subdivision (b) of Section 12693.86.

(c) In conducting an administrative review of an appeal, the executive director may contact the appellant and any other party for further information.

(d) The executive director’s decision shall be in writing.

(e) The appellant retains the right to request an administrative hearing if the appellant is not satisfied with the decision of the executive director. Such a request shall be filed within 30 calendar days of receipt of the executive director’s decision. It shall include a clear and concise statement of what action is being appealed, and the reasons the executive director’s decision is not correct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.88.

In addition to the appeal process established above, the board shall establish a program review process. If a subscriber or purchasing credit member is not eligible to file an appeal pursuant to Section 12693.85, but wants to have any program decision reviewed, he or she may request that the program review the decision. A review pursuant to this section is separate from and independent of an appeal pursuant to Section 12693.85, and a person that files a request pursuant to this section shall not, thereby, gain any right of appeal. Pursuant to Section 12693.49, any dissatisfaction with an action of a participating health, vision, or dental plan shall be resolved with the plan rather than by requesting program review. When an appeal that requests an administrative hearing is received, the appeal shall be set for hearing as provided in Section 12693.89.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.89.

(a) Administrative hearings of appeals shall be conducted according to the appeal procedures, including pre- and post-hearing procedures, set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1140) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of Title 1 of the California Code of Regulations. Article 3 (commencing with Section 1140) is hereby incorporated by reference, subject to the following modifications:

(1) Reference to the Health and Welfare Agency or the component department shall be deemed reference to the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board.

(2) Reference to the private nonprofit human service organization shall be deemed reference to the appellant.

(3) Reference to Health and Safety Code sections providing the bases, grounds, authorization, or procedures for appeals shall be deemed reference to the bases and authorization, for appeal found in Section 12693.85 and the appeal procedures found in this section.

(4) The 30-day time period specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1140 of Title 1 of the California Code of Regulations shall be extended to 60 days, and the 10-day time period in subdivision (a) of Section 1141 of Title 1 of the California Code of Regulations shall be extended to 30 days.

(5) If the proposed decision submitted to the board is not adopted as the decision, the board may itself decide the case on the record, or may refer the case to the same hearing officer to take additional evidence. If the case is referred back to the hearing officer, the hearing officer shall prepare a new proposed decision based on the additional evidence and the record of the prior hearing.

(6) The decision of the board shall be issued within 90 days following the initial hearing or, if the case is referred back to the hearing officer, within 90 days of the second hearing.

(b) The board may elect to have a hearing conducted by an Administrative Law Judge employed by the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Rural Demonstration Project [12693.91. - 12693.915.]

12693.91.

(a) The State Department of Health Services, in conjunction with the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, the County Medical Services Program board, and the Rural Health Policy Council, may develop and administer up to five demonstration projects in rural areas that are likely to contain a significant level of uninsured children, including seasonal and migratory worker dependents. In addition to any other funds provided pursuant to this section the grants for demonstration projects may include funds pursuant to subdivision (d).

(b) The purpose of the demonstration projects shall be to fund rural collaborative health care networks to alleviate unique problems of access to health care in rural areas.

(c) The State Department of Health Services, in conjunction with the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board and Rural Health Policy Council, shall establish the criteria and standards for eligibility to be used in requests for proposals or requests for application, the application review process, determining the maximum amount and number of grants to be awarded, preference and priority of projects, and compliance monitoring after receiving comment from the public.

(d) The grants may include funds for purchasing equipment, making capital expenditures, and providing infrastructure, including, but not limited to, salaries and payment of leaseholds. The funds under this subdivision may only be awarded to qualified eligible health care entities as determined by the State Department of Health Services. Title to any equipment or capital improvement purchased or acquired with grant funds shall vest in the grantee for the public good and not the state. Capital expenditures shall not include the acquisition of land. Notwithstanding subdivision (e), this subdivision shall be implemented only when funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act or another statute to fund the cost of implementing this subdivision.

(e) This section shall only become operative upon federal approval of the state plan or subsequent amendments for the program and approval of federal financial participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 230, Sec. 21.   Effective August 11, 2003.   Section operative as prescribed in subd. (e).)
-------------------------------------------

12693.915.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to utilize fiscal resources in the most prudent and cost-efficient manner and to maximize the use of federal funds for services when feasible. Therefore, the Legislature intends to access funds from the Unallocated Account in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund created in Section 30122 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and as appropriated in the annual Budget Act, and to use these funds to obtain a 65-percent federal match through California’s allocation from the State Children’s Health Insurance Program (SCHIP). These funds will then be used under the state’s Healthy Families Program specifically for the rural demonstration projects established in Section 12693.91.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 30122 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, funding for the rural demonstration projects as provided under the Health Families Program may be made available from the funds appropriated from the Unallocated Account in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund and from funding received pursuant to Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act. These funds shall be used as provided under Section 12693.91.

(c) Subdivision (b) constitutes an amendment of the Tobacco Tax and Health Protection Act of 1988, as added by Proposition 99.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 161, Sec. 1.   Effective August 2, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Reports [12693.92. - 12693.95.]

12693.92.

(a) The program shall prepare an annual report in conformance with the requirements of Section 2108 of Title XXI of the Social Security Act (P.L. 105-33). A copy of the report shall be provided to the Legislature and other interested parties.

(b) As soon as possible, but no later than July 1, 2000, the board shall include in its annual report information on (1) how assurance of preventive services by health plans and health care providers is achieved; (2) the performance of health plans and providers in providing preventive services and addressing barriers to service delivery; and (3) the mechanism or mechanisms that will be used to identify changes over time in the health status of children enrolled in the program. Beginning no later than July 1, 2001, the report shall include information about changes in the health status of children participating in the program.

(c) The board shall immediately provide the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature with a copy of their submittal to the federal government to meet the requirements for state plan provisions as contained in Chapter 1 of Title XXI of the Social Security Act. Any and all subsequent amendments to the state plan shall also be provided accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.925.

(a) The Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board shall report to the Legislature on or before January 30, 2004, the following information with respect to the State Children’s Health Insurance Program:

(1) A list of the categories of vulnerable children who should be the targets of public health initiatives, including, but not limited to, immigrant children, homeless children, and other children that face health disparities.

(2) Recommendations on innovative methods available under the federal program for addressing health needs and barriers to care for the identified groups of vulnerable children. The board shall report as many recommendations as possible that are available under the federal program and the expected impact of each recommendation.

(3) Recommendations on innovative methods available under the federal program for developing in urban areas initiatives similar to the rural demonstration projects. The board shall report as many recommendations as possible that are available under the federal program and the expected impact of each recommendation.

(b) The board shall seek input, at regularly scheduled meetings of the board, from the Healthy Families Advisory Panel and stakeholder organizations, including, but not limited to, organizations that represent immigrant and homeless populations, other communities that experience health disparities, and traditional providers of care to low-income populations.

(c) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 800, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.93.

The board shall prepare an evaluation of the program and other state efforts to expand coverage to children in conformance with Section 2108 of Title XXI of the Social Security Act. The evaluation shall incorporate measurement of the delivery of preventive services by health plans and health care providers and assessment of changes over time in the health status of children participating in the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 156.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.95.

(a) The board in consultation with the Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs shall provide the Legislature by April 15, 1998, a proposal assessing the viability of providing additional drug and alcohol treatment services for children enrolled in the program.

If the board determines that it is feasible to provide additional federal funds received pursuant to Title XXI (commencing with Section 2101) of the Social Security Act to counties to finance drug and alcohol services and required federal approval is obtained, the board shall negotiate with participating health plans to establish memoranda of understanding between plans and counties to facilitate referral of children in need of these
 services.

(b) Based on the April 15, 1998, report by the board to the Legislature, the Legislature finds and declares that there is a statewide gap in publicly funded alcohol and other drug treatment for adolescents which is significant and systemic.

(1) Therefore, the State Department of Health Care Services, in cooperation with the board, shall do the following:

(A) Review capacity needs for the Healthy Families Program target group after year one data has been collected and an assessment of the adequacy of the benefit can be made.

(B) Request that counties provide data on the number of adolescents requesting alcohol and other drug treatment and whether they are participating in the Healthy Families Program.

(2) The board shall do the following:

(A) Request the participating health plans to voluntarily collect data, as prescribed by the board, on the number of children needing services that exceed the substance abuse benefit in their plan.

(B) Upon contract renewal, require participating health plans to collect and report the data.

(C) By September 1, 1999, provide the policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature with an analysis of the data obtained by the Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs and from the participating health plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 76.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Funds [12693.96. - 12693.97.]

12693.96.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Healthy Families Fund which is, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, continuously appropriated to the board for the purposes specified in this part.(b) The board shall authorize the expenditure from the fund of any state funds, federal funds, or family contributions deposited into the fund. This shall include the authority for the board to authorize the State Department of Health Services to transfer funds appropriated to the department for the program to the Healthy Families Fund, and to also deposit those funds in, and to disburse those funds from, the Healthy Families Fund.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this part shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, as provided under Title XXI of the Social Security Act, federal financial participation is available and state plan approval is obtained, except as specified in Section 12693.76.

(d) Nothing in this part is intended to establish an entitlement for individual coverage.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12963.96 by Stats. 1999, Ch. 146, Sec. 23.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.97.

The State Department of Health Services and the board may explore and utilize any options available under federal law to allow the use of charitable funding as a match for federal funds for use in the provision of coverage by private and public not-for-profit organizations consistent with the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12963.97 by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 129.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16.1. Healthy Families Bridge Benefits Program [12693.98. - 12694.]

12693.98.
